Illinois, session 104th, SB879.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Agricultural Experiences Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 10/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Agricultural Experiences Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-492, eff. 1-1-22.)